Massachusetts, session 194th, H1026.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There is hereby established a special commission to study the noise effects
of hunting migratory game birds in neighborhoods and communities located in established
coastal zones.
SECTION 2. The commission shall study and assess the impacts, specific to noise, that
persons hunting migratory game birds from a water craft have on the residents of neighborhoods
and communities immediately located within the coastal zones established by the Department of
Fish and Games. The commission shall also study the regulated distance that a person hunting
from a water craft is required to be located from land to determine if this amount needs to be
increased.
SECTION 3. The commission shall consist of a member of the Senate appointed by the
President of the Senate; a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of
of 2

the House of Representatives; a member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Minority Leader;
a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the House Minority leader; the Secretary
of the Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs or his designee who shall serve as
Chairman of the commission; the Commissioner of the Department of Fish and Game or his
designee; The Commissioner of the Massachusetts Department of Revenue or his designee; a
representative from the sports hunting industry to be appointed by the Commissioner of the
Department of Fish and Game; The members of the commission shall be appointed not later July
3, 2026.
SECTION 4. The commission shall hold public meetings in Newburyport, Nahant,
Marshfield and Cape Cod to assist in the collection and evaluation of data and testimony.
SECTION 5. The commission shall prepare a written report detailing its findings and
recommendations, if any, together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry those
recommendations into effect. The commission shall submit its report to the governor, the
secretary of the commonwealth, the Senate President and Speaker of the House, the Chairmen of
the Joint Committee on Natural Resources, the House and Senate Chairman of the Ways and
Means Committees, the Chairmen of the Joint Committee on Revenue, and the Chairmen of the
Joint Committee on Tourism, Arts and Cultural Development not later than December 31, 2026.
of 2